District of Columbia statutes.
1-1061.07

Methods of applying for military-overseas ballot.

(a)

A covered voter who is registered to vote in the District may apply for a military-overseas ballot using either the regular absentee ballot application on the form prescribed by the Board or the federal postcard application or the application’s electronic equivalent.

(b)

A covered voter who is not registered to vote in the District may use a federal postcard application or the application’s electronic equivalent to apply to register to vote under § 1-1061.06 and for a military-overseas ballot.

(c)

The Board shall ensure that the electronic transmission system described in § 1-1061.04(c) is capable of accepting the submission of both a federal postcard application and any other approved electronic military-overseas ballot application sent to the Board. The voter may use the electronic transmission system or any other method approved under federal law to apply for a military-overseas ballot.

(d)

A covered voter may use the declaration accompanying a federal write-in absentee ballot as an application for a military-overseas ballot simultaneously with the submission of the federal write-in absentee ballot, if the declaration is received by the Board by the 7th day before the election.

(e)

To receive the benefits of this subchapter, a covered voter must inform the Board that the voter is a covered voter. Methods of informing the Board that a voter is a covered voter include:

(1)

The use of a federal postcard application or federal write-in absentee ballot;

(2)

The use of an overseas address on an approved voter registration application or ballot application; and

(3)

The inclusion on an approved voter registration application or ballot application of other information sufficient to identify the voter as a covered voter.

(f)

This subchapter does not preclude a covered voter from voting with a regular absentee ballot as authorized by the Board.

June 5, 2012, D.C. Law 19-137, § 107, 59 DCR 2542
Uniform Law: This section is based on § 7 of the Uniform Military and Overseas Voters Act.